Nebraska, session 109, LB380A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $150,000 from the Health and
Human Services Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $150,000 from the Health and
Human Services Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health and Human
Services, for Program 33, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative
Bill 380, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $100,000 for FY2025-26 or
$100,000 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $2,118,003 from the Health and
Human Services Cash Fund and $4,212,005 from federal funds for FY2025-26 and
(2) $4,386,006 from the Health and Human Services Cash Fund and $8,424,011 from
federal funds for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health and Human Services, for
Program 348, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 380, One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$2,118,003 Cash Funds and $4,212,005 federal funds for state aid, which shall
only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $4,386,006 Cash Funds and $8,424,011 federal funds for
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-